Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
PART 2 Delinquency Prevention and Community Based Services

Administrative rules and regulations.

Title V Prevention, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Grant Programs, Grants of Children and Youth Coordinating Council, § 96-1-.02.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this part, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 21 (1992).

49-5-150.
Legislative policy and intent.

The policy and intent of the General Assembly in delinquency and other child related problems
and community based services can be summarized as follows:

Such programs should be planned and organized at the community level within the state, and such planning efforts should include appropriate representation from local government, local agencies serving families and children, both public and private, local business leaders, citizens with an interest in youth problems, youth representatives, and others as may be appropriate in a particular community. The role of the state should be to provide technical assistance, access to funding, program information, and assistance to local leadership in appropriate planning;

When a child is adjudicated to be within the jurisdiction of the juvenile court or other state agencies, such child should be carefully evaluated through the available community-level resources including a comprehensive team of mental health providers, social services providers, public health and other available medical providers, public schools, and others, as appropriate, prior to the juvenile hearing dealing with disposition so that the disposition of the court may be made with an understanding of the needs of the child and after consideration of the resources available to meet those needs;

It is contrary to the policy of the state for a court to separate a child from his or her own family or commit a child to an institution without a careful evaluation of the needs of the child;

The General Assembly finds that state and local government should be responsive to the need for community based services which would provide an alternative to commitment to an institution. The General Assembly intends that state government should be responsive to this need through the council by helping public and private local groups to plan, develop, and fund community based programs, both residential and nonresidential;

It is the intent of the General Assembly that the council develop a funding mechanism that will provide state support for programs that meet the standards developed under the provisions of this part.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-150

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1576, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, § 8.

49-5-151.
Implementation of part.

It shall be the duty of the council to arrange for the implementation of this part as follows:

To assist local governments and private service agencies in the development of community based programs and to provide information on the availability of potential funding sources and to provide whatever assistance may be requested in making application for needed funding;

To approve yearly program evaluations and to make recommendations to the General Assembly concerning continuation funding that might be supported by that evaluation;

To approve program evaluation standards by which all programs developed under the provisions of this part may be objectively evaluated. Such standards as may be developed for the purpose of program evaluation shall be in addition to any current standards as may be applicable under the existing authority of the department. Minimum operating standards as well as program evaluation standards as may be needed for new program models designed to fulfill the intent of this part may be developed at the discretion of the council;

To develop a formula for funding on a matching basis community based services as provided for in this part. This formula may be based upon a county’s or counties’ relative ability to fund community based programs for children and youth. Local governments receiving state matching funds for programs under the provisions of this part must maintain the same overall level of effort that existed at the time of the filing of the county assessment of youth needs with the council;

To provide yearly program evaluation of the effectiveness of delinquency and other prevention programs and community based services developed or supported under provisions of this part;

To develop a program to coordinate the resources of state government within the appropriate departments to provide technical assistance to local areas within the state to assist them in planning delinquency and other prevention programs and community based services for youth, including but not limited to the following:

Study local youth needs;

Gather data on children within the jurisdiction of the state systems;

Evaluate resources for providing services or care to these children;

Provide information about various program models which might be appropriate in relation to the needs of children and youth;

Help in planning for evaluation; and

Provide such other assistance as may be appropriate;

To encourage the development of delinquency and other prevention programs and community based services by private groups so that:

Such programs can be responsive to local needs;

Local leadership and private groups can be responsible for their programs;

Programs which meet state standards can be assisted by state and federal funding; and

Available private funds can be appropriately utilized along with available state and federal funds;

To provide for the development of programs which have a plan for evaluation from the beginning so that successful program models can be replicated as appropriate; and

To provide for the development of delinquency and other prevention programs and community based services under public auspices where there is no local private leadership.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-151

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1576, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, § 9.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, a misspelling of “existed” was corrected near the end of paragraph (4).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, the subsection designation “(a)” was deleted, since there is no subsection (b).

49-5-152.
Purchase of care or services from public or private agencies.

The council and any other appropriate state or local agency are authorized to purchase care or services from public or private agencies providing delinquency or other prevention programs or community based services, provided the program meets the state standards as authorized by Code Section 49-5-151.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-152

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1576, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, § 10.

49-5-153.
Annual report.

The council shall prepare an annual report on the progress of the community based programs of this state which shall include the most current institutional and out-of-home placement populations of children being served by the various departments of state government and which shall include comparative costs of all children-serving agencies. Such report shall be submitted to the Governor and the various state departments providing services to children.
The council shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members of the General Assembly but shall notify the members of the availability of the report in the manner which it deems to be most effective and efficient.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-153

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1576, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, § 11; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 40/SB 49.

49-5-154.
Study of youth needs.

The governing authority of each participating county shall establish a local advisory group which includes representation from each component of the local children’s services systems and other interested parties. The advisory group shall appraise the council on the needs of children and youth in its community giving particular attention to the need for prevention programs and community based services, residential or nonresidential, which would provide an alternative to commitment to or placement or custody in the Department of Juvenile Justice or the Department of Human Services and placement in any juvenile detention facility as defined in Code Section 49-4A-1. Such appraisal shall be made annually and in writing. The governing authority of the county may request technical assistance from the council in conducting such study.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-154

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1576, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 1871, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, § 12; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 33; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 4-60/HB 242.

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, substituted “any juvenile detention facility as defined in Code Section 49-4A-1” for “a youth development center, foster home, or any other institution” at the end of the second sentence. See editor’s note for applicability.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 294, § 5-1/HB 242, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2014, and shall apply to all offenses which occur and juvenile proceedings commenced on and after such date. Any offense occurring before January 1, 2014, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such offense and shall be considered a prior adjudication for the purpose of imposing a disposition that provides for a different penalty for subsequent adjudications, of whatever class, pursuant to this Act. The enactment of this Act shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before January 1, 2014, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.”

49-5-155.
Effect of article on Department of Juvenile Justice; office as
recipient entity for federal grants.

This article shall in no way preempt, duplicate, or supersede services, duties, or other functions performed pursuant to law or regulations by the Department of Juvenile Justice.

Other than the Department of Juvenile Justice, the Governor’s Office for Children and Families created pursuant to Code Section 49-5-132 and the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council shall be the only other authorized controlling recipient entity for grants under the United States Department of Justice Juvenile Justice Delinquency and Prevention Grants.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-5-155

, enacted by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1576, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 435, § 13; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1983, § 34; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1453, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 12/HB 1054; Ga. L. 2015, p. 890, § 8/HB 263.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, inserted “and the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council” in subsection (b).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 1/HB 1054, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act may be cited as the ‘Children and Family Services Strengthening Act of 2008.’ ”

Ga. L. 2008, p. 568, § 2, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds that well-intentioned efforts over the years have resulted in the creation of several agencies focused on preventing child abuse and juvenile delinquency, on serving at-risk families and troubled youth, and on promoting the improvement of our state’s child welfare system. The General Assembly further finds that the work of some of these agencies overlaps, and that the at-risk families and troubled children of Georgia will be more efficiently and effectively served by consolidating the Children and Youth Coordinating Council with the Children’s Trust Fund Commission, by placing the functions of the Georgia Child Fatality Review Panel under the supervision of the Child Advocate for the Protection of Children, and by encouraging these consolidated agencies to collaborate to create a consistent vision for serving the needs of our state’s families in need.”